Hawaii statutes.
PART
VIII. RECYCLING

[§201-101] Development of markets for
recycled materials. The department, to the extent possible, and with the
assistance of the office of solid waste management, shall coordinate state
efforts to develop markets for recycled materials. The department shall
integrate this activity with its other programs, specifically those programs
relating to business development and energy. The department shall coordinate
market activities with the counties and clarify their respective roles and
responsibilities. [L 1991, c 324, pt of §3]

Cross References

Construction
projects; recycled glass requirements, see §103D-407.

Glass container
recovery, see §§342G-81 to 89.

Integrated solid
waste management, see chapter 342G.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next